Utah statutes.
77-18-6.5.    Liability of rescued person for costs of emergency response.

(1)  Any person who violates Section 76-6-206.1 whose conduct required emergency care, rescue, assistance, or recovery services at the scene of an abandoned or inactive mine may be charged with the expenses incurred in meeting the emergency.

(2)  The court's order shall be a judgment which orders the payment of reimbursement to any public agency or private body that incurred the expenses.  The judgment shall constitute a lien when recorded in the judgment docket and shall have the same effect and is subject to the same rules as a judgment for money in a civil action.

(3)  The liability imposed under this section is in addition to and not in limitation of any other liability that may be imposed.



Enacted by Chapter 223, 1997 General Session

